California statutes. Welfare and Institutions Code
(A) The barriers the agency has identified that substantially impede or prohibit the electronic provision of hearing documents.

(B) The steps the agency is taking to address these barriers.

(2) This subdivision shall become inoperative on the date that the statewide electronic case management system administered by the State Department of Social Services becomes operational and has the capacity to provide position statements to claimants through secure electronic means.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 613, Sec. 3.   (SB 1071)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

10953.

A hearing under this chapter shall be conducted by administrative law judges employed by the department, unless the director orders that it shall be conducted by himself or herself. However, the director may contract with the Office of Administrative Hearings to conduct hearings.

Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 11500) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code shall not apply to any hearing conducted under this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1986, Ch. 415, Sec. 3.   Effective July 17, 1986.)
-------------------------------------------

10953.5.

(a) The director has authority to appoint the department’s administrative law judges as provided in Section 10555.

(b) Each administrative law judge shall have been admitted to practice law in this state and shall possess any other qualifications prescribed by the State Personnel Board. All persons in the office of the chief referee employed as hearing officers by the department prior to the effective date of this section shall be deemed to be administrative law judges.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 415, Sec. 4.   Effective July 17, 1986.)
-------------------------------------------

10954.

The director or administrative law judge conducting the hearing, shall have all of the powers and authority conferred upon the head of a department in Article 2 (commencing with Section 11180) of Chapter 2 of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1986, Ch. 415, Sec. 5.   Effective July 17, 1986.)
-------------------------------------------

10955.

The hearing shall be conducted in an impartial and informal manner in order to encourage free and open discussion by participants. All testimony shall be submitted under oath or affirmation. The person conducting the hearing shall not be bound by rules of procedure or evidence applicable in judicial proceedings. At the hearing the applicant or recipient may appear in person with counsel of his own choosing, or in person and without such counsel.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1784.)
-------------------------------------------

10956.

The proceedings at the hearing shall be reported by a phonographic reporter or otherwise perpetuated by mechanical, electronic, or other means capable of reproduction or transcription.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1784.)
-------------------------------------------

10957.

The person conducting the hearing, upon good cause shown, may continue the hearing for a period of not to exceed 30 days. When the refusal of a county to accept a signed application for aid or services is an issue, the director may require the county to accept the application, and may continue the case until the results of the investigation have been reported to him or her. In any such case in which aid is awarded by the director or his or her designee, the payments shall commence at the time indicated by the director or his or her designee.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1986, Ch. 415, Sec. 6.   Effective July 17, 1986.)
-------------------------------------------

10958.

If the hearing is conducted by an administrative law judge, he or she shall prepare a fair, impartial, and independent proposed decision, in writing and in such format that it may be adopted as the director’s decision and, after approval of the decision by the chief administrative law judge of the department, the chief administrative law judge shall file a copy of the proposed decision, within 75 days after the conclusion of the hearing, with the director.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1986, Ch. 415, Sec. 7.   Effective July 17, 1986.)
-------------------------------------------

10958.1.

The issues at the hearing shall be limited to those issues which are reasonably related to the request for hearing or other issues identified by either party which they have mutually agreed, prior to or at the hearing, to discuss. All of those issues shall be addressed in the hearing decisions.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 415, Sec. 7.5.   Effective July 17, 1986.)
-------------------------------------------

10959.

(a) After an administrative law judge has held a hearing and issued a proposed decision, within 30 days after the department has received a copy of the administrative law judge’s proposed decision, or within the three business days for an expedited resolution of an appeal of an adverse benefit determination described in Section 10951.5 after any extensions that may apply under subdivision (c) of Section 10951.5, the director may take any of the following actions:

(1) Adopt the decision in its entirety.

(2) Decide the matter themselves on the record after reviewing the transcript or recording of the hearing without taking
 additional evidence. 

(3) Order a further hearing to be conducted by the director or another administrative law judge on their behalf that affords the parties the opportunity to present and respond to additional evidence.

(b) A proposed decision shall be deemed affirmed and adopted if the director fails to adopt the proposed decision, decide the matter on the record after reviewing the transcript or recording of the hearing without taking additional evidence, or order a further hearing within the 30 days or within the three business days for an expedited resolution of an appeal of an adverse benefit determination described in Section 10951.5 after any extensions that may apply under subdivision (c) of Section 10951.5. If the director decides the matter, a copy of the
 director’s alternated
 decision shall be served on the applicant or recipient and on the affected county, and, if the director’s decision differs materially from the proposed decision of the administrative law judge, a copy of that proposed decision shall also be served on the applicant or recipient and on the affected county. The director’s alternated decision shall contain a statement of the facts and evidence, including references to the applicable sections of law and regulations, and the analysis that supports the director’s decision. If a further hearing is ordered, it shall be conducted in the same manner and within the same time limits specified for the original hearing.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 944, Sec. 1.   (AB 1355)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

10960.

(a) Within 30 days after receiving the decision of the director, which is the proposed decision of an administrative law judge adopted by the director as final, a final decision rendered by an administrative law judge, or a decision issued by the director himself or herself, the affected county or applicant or recipient may file a request with the director for a rehearing. The director shall immediately serve a copy of the request on the other party to the hearing and that other party may within five days of the service file with the director a written statement supporting or objecting to the request. The director shall grant or deny the request no later than the 35th working day after the request is made to ensure
 the prompt and efficient administration of the hearing process. If the director grants the request, the rehearing shall be conducted in the same manner and subject to the same time limits as the original hearing.

(b) The grounds for requesting a rehearing are as follows:

(1) The adopted decision is inconsistent with the law.

(2) The adopted decision is not supported by the evidence in the record.

(3) The adopted decision is not supported by the findings.

(4) The adopted decision does not address all of the claims or issues raised by the parties.

(5) The adopted decision does not address all of the claims or issues supported by the record or evidence.

(6) The adopted decision does not set forth sufficient information to determine the basis for its legal conclusion.

(7) Newly discovered evidence, that was not in custody or available to the party requesting rehearing at the time of the hearing, is now available and the new evidence, had it been introduced, could have changed the hearing decision.

(8) For any other reason necessary to prevent the abuse of discretion or an error of law, or for any other reason consistent with Section 1094.5 of the Code of Civil Procedure.

(c) The notice granting or
 denying the rehearing request shall explain the reasons and legal basis for granting or denying the request for rehearing.

(d) The decision of the director, which is the proposed decision of an administrative law judge adopted by the director as final, a final decision rendered by an administrative law judge, or a decision issued by the director himself or herself, remains final pending a request for a rehearing. Only after a rehearing is granted is the decision no longer the final decision in the case.

(e) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, a rehearing request or decision shall not be a prerequisite to filing an action under Section 10962.

(f) (1) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), an
 applicant or recipient otherwise may be entitled to a rehearing pursuant to this chapter if he or she files a request more than 30 days after the decision of the director is issued, or if he or she did not receive a copy of the decision of the director, or if there is good cause for filing beyond the 30-day period. The director may determine whether good cause exists.

(2) For purposes of this subdivision, “good cause” means a substantial and compelling reason beyond the party’s control, considering the length of the delay, the diligence of the party making the request, and the potential prejudice to the other party. The inability of a person to understand an adequate and language-compliant notice, in and of itself, shall not constitute good cause. The department shall not grant a request for a rehearing for good cause if the request
 is filed more than 180 days after the order or action complained of.

(3) This section shall not preclude the application of the principles of equity jurisdiction as otherwise provided by law.

(g) Notwithstanding the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code), the department shall implement this section through an all-county information notice no later than January 1, 2008. The department may also provide further instructions through training notes.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 869, Sec. 9.   (AB 617)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

10961.

The decision of the director need not specify the amount of the award to be paid unless the amount of the award is an issue. If the decision is in favor of the applicant or recipient, the county department shall pay to the applicant or recipient, without the necessity of establishing his or her present need, the amount of aid the director finds he or she is entitled to receive pursuant to the director’s decision, payment to commence as of the date the person was first entitled thereto, or grant to him or her the services to which he or she is entitled.

The award shall be determined no later than 30 days following the date that the hearing decision is received by the county, or 30 days from the date the additional information needed for compliance with the decision is provided to the county. After the award is made, the county and the claimant shall be notified by the department of its determination regarding the county’s compliance with the decision.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1986, Ch. 415, Sec. 9.5.   Effective July 17, 1986.)
-------------------------------------------

10962.

The applicant, recipient, respondent, or the affected county, within one year after receiving notice of the department’s final decision, may file a petition with the superior court, under the provisions of Section 1094.5 of the Code of Civil Procedure, praying for a review of the entire proceedings in the matter, upon questions of law involved in the case. Such review, if granted, shall be the exclusive remedy available to the applicant, recipient, or respondent, or county for review of the department’s decision. The director shall be the sole respondent in such proceedings. Immediately upon being served, the director shall serve a copy of the petition on the other party entitled to judicial review and such party shall
 have the right to intervene in the proceedings.

No filing fee shall be required for the filing of a petition pursuant to this section. Any such petition to the superior court shall be entitled to a preference in setting a date for hearing on the petition. No bond shall be required in the case of any petition for review, nor in any appeal therefrom. The applicant or recipient shall be entitled to reasonable attorney’s fees and costs, if he obtains a decision in his favor.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 732, Sec. 58.   (AB 404)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

10963.

The county director shall comply with and execute every decision of the director rendered pursuant to this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1784.)
-------------------------------------------

10964.

The department shall compile and distribute to each county department a current digest of decisions, properly indexed, rendered under this chapter, and each such digest shall be open to public inspection, subject, however, to the confidentiality requirements set forth in federal and state laws and regulations.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1784.)
-------------------------------------------

10965.

Nothing in this chapter shall prevent the filing of the request for a hearing by the legal representative, or, if there is no authorized legal representative, by an heir of a deceased applicant or recipient, in behalf of the decedent’s estate, to the end that rights not determined at the time of death shall accrue to the estate of the applicant or recipient.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1784.)
-------------------------------------------

10966.

(a) In addition to any other delegation powers granted to the director under law, the director may delegate his or her powers to adopt final decisions under this chapter to all administrative law judges within specified ranges in the department, in the types of cases deemed appropriate by the director. The authority to adopt final decisions shall not be contingent upon the outcome of the judge’s resolution of the case or issue, nor upon the identity of a particular administrative law judge. The defined areas of delegation shall be published by the department after interested groups such as the Coalition of California Welfare Rights Organizations, legal aid societies, and the County Welfare Directors Association have had a reasonable amount of time to review and comment.

(b) Notwithstanding any other provisions of this chapter, decisions rendered by the administrative law judges under the authority of this section shall be treated, for all purposes, as the decision of the director. The affected county, recipient, or applicant has the right to request a rehearing pursuant to Section 10960, and the right to petition for judicial review pursuant to Section 10962. 

(c) If the director chooses to exercise the authority to delegate his or her powers to adopt final decisions to administrative law judges, the delegation shall be in writing. Any such delegation instrument shall be a public record available at all times, including the time of hearing, from each administrative law judge to whom that authority has been delegated. The written delegation instrument shall include paragraphs (1) and (2) of the following, and may include paragraph (3) of the following:

(1) It shall specify the administrative law judges that are authorized to render final decisions on his or her behalf, including the effective date of the authorization.

(2) It shall specify the types of cases or issues that are subject to his or her delegation of final authority.

(3) It may include any other implementation instructions which he or she determines are necessary for the effective implementation of this section.

(d) Decisions rendered by administrative law judges pursuant to the provisions of this section shall be fair, impartial, independent, in writing, and in the format prescribed by the Chief Administrative Law Judge.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 415, Sec. 10.   Effective July 17, 1986.)
-------------------------------------------

10967.

At the time of the hearing the recipient has a right to raise the adequacy of the county’s notice of action as an issue. If the administrative law judge determines that adequate notice was provided, the recipient shall agree to discuss the substantive issue or issues or the case shall be dismissed. If the administrative law judge determines that adequate notice was not provided, the case will be postponed unless the recipient waives the adequate notice requirement and agrees to discuss the substantive issue or issues at the hearing. If the notice was not adequate and involved termination or reduction of aid, retroactive action shall be taken by the county to reinstate aid pending.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 415, Sec. 10.5.   Effective July 17, 1986.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 9. Penalties [10980. - 10980.]

10980.

(a) Any person who, willfully and knowingly, with the intent to deceive, makes a false statement or representation or knowingly fails to disclose a material fact in order to obtain aid under the provisions of this division or who, knowing he or she is not entitled thereto, attempts to obtain aid or to continue to receive aid to which he or she is not entitled, or to receive a larger amount than that to which he or she is legally entitled, is guilty of a misdemeanor, punishable by imprisonment in a county jail for a period of not more than six months, by a fine of not more than five hundred dollars ($500), or by both imprisonment and fine.

(b) Any person who knowingly makes more than one
 application for aid under the provisions of this division with the intent of establishing multiple entitlements for any person for the same period or who makes an application for that aid for a fictitious or nonexistent person or by claiming a false identity for any person is guilty of a felony, punishable by imprisonment pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 1170 of the Penal Code for a period of 16 months, two years, or three years, by a fine of not more than five thousand dollars ($5,000), or by both that imprisonment and fine; or by imprisonment in a county jail for a period of not more than one year, or by a fine of not more than one thousand dollars ($1,000), or by both imprisonment and fine.

(c) Whenever any person has, willfully and knowingly, with the intent to deceive, by means of false statement or representation, or by
 failing to disclose a material fact, or by impersonation or other fraudulent device, obtained or retained aid under the provisions of this division for himself or herself or for a child not in fact entitled thereto, the person obtaining this aid shall be punished as follows:

(1) If the total amount of the aid obtained or retained is nine hundred fifty dollars ($950) or less, by imprisonment in a county jail for a period of not more than six months, by a fine of not more than five hundred dollars ($500), or by both imprisonment and fine.

(2) If the total amount of the aid obtained or retained is more than nine hundred fifty dollars ($950), by imprisonment pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 1170 of the Penal Code for a period of 16 months, two years, or three years, by a fine of
 not more than five thousand dollars ($5,000), or by both that imprisonment and fine; or by imprisonment in a county jail for a period of not more than one year, by a fine of not more than one thousand dollars ($1,000), or by both imprisonment and fine.

(d) Any person who knowingly uses, transfers, acquires, or possesses blank authorizations to participate in the federal Supplemental Nutrition Assistance Program in any manner not authorized by Chapter 10 (commencing with Section 18900) of Part 6 with the intent to defraud is guilty of a felony, punishable by imprisonment pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 1170 of the Penal Code for a period of 16 months, two years, or three years, by a fine of not more than five thousand dollars ($5,000), or by both that imprisonment and fine.

(e) Any person who counterfeits or alters or knowingly uses, transfers, acquires, or possesses counterfeited or altered authorizations to participate in the federal Supplemental Nutrition Assistance Program or to receive CalFresh benefits or electronically transferred benefits in any manner not authorized by the former federal Food Stamp Act of 1964 (Public Law 88-525 and all amendments thereto) or the federal Food and Nutrition Act of 2008 (7 U.S.C. Sec. 2011 et seq.) or the federal regulations pursuant to the act is guilty of forgery.

(f) Any person who fraudulently appropriates CalFresh benefits, electronically transferred benefits, or authorizations to participate in the federal Supplemental Nutrition Assistance Program with which he or she has been entrusted pursuant to his or her duties as a public employee is guilty of
 embezzlement of public funds.

(g) Any person who knowingly uses, transfers, sells, purchases, or possesses CalFresh benefits, electronically transferred benefits, or authorizations to participate in the federal Supplemental Nutrition Assistance Program in any manner not authorized by Chapter 10 (commencing with Section 18900) of Part 6, or by the former federal Food Stamp Act of 1977 (Public Law 95-113 and all amendments thereto) or the federal Food and Nutrition Act of 2008 (7 U.S.C. Sec. 2011 et seq.) (1) is guilty of a misdemeanor if the face value of the benefits or the authorizations to participate is nine hundred fifty dollars ($950) or less, and shall be punished by imprisonment in a county jail for a period of not more than six months, by a fine of not more than five hundred dollars ($500), or by both imprisonment and fine, or (2) is
 guilty of a felony if the face value of the CalFresh benefits or the authorizations to participate exceeds nine hundred fifty dollars ($950), and shall be punished by imprisonment pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 1170 of the Penal Code for a period of 16 months, two years, or three years, by a fine of not more than five thousand dollars ($5,000), or by both that imprisonment and fine, or by imprisonment in a county jail for a period of not more than one year, or by a fine of not more than one thousand dollars ($1,000), or by both imprisonment and fine.

(h) (1) If the violation of subdivision (f) or (g) is committed by means of an electronic transfer of benefits, in addition and consecutive to the penalties for the violation, or attempted violation, of those subdivisions, the court shall impose the following
 punishment:

(A) If the electronic transfer of benefits exceeds fifty thousand dollars ($50,000), an additional term pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 1170 of the Penal Code of one year.

(B) If the electronic transfer of benefits exceeds one hundred fifty thousand dollars ($150,000), an additional term pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 1170 of the Penal Code of two years.

(C) If the electronic transfer of benefits exceeds one million dollars ($1,000,000), an additional term pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 1170 of the Penal Code of three years.

(D) If the electronic transfer of benefits exceeds two million five hundred thousand dollars ($2,500,000),
 an additional term pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 1170 of the Penal Code of four years.

(2) In any accusatory pleading involving multiple charges of violations of subdivision (f) or (g), or both, committed by means of an electronic transfer of benefits, the additional terms provided in paragraph (1) may be imposed if the aggregate losses to the victims from all violations exceed the amounts specified in this paragraph and arise from a common scheme or plan.

(i) A person who is punished by an additional term of imprisonment under another law for a violation of subdivision (f) or (g) shall not receive an additional term of imprisonment under subdivision (h).

(j) (1) A person shall not be
 subject to criminal prosecution, under this section or under any other law, for an overpayment or overissuance of benefits, obtained under the California Work Opportunity and Responsibility to Kids (CalWORKs) program (Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 11200) of Part 3) or the CalFresh program (Chapter 10 (commencing with Section 18900) of Part 6), for any month in which the county human services agency was in receipt of any Income and Eligibility Verification System (IEVS) data match information indicating any potential for an overpayment or an overissuance and for which the county human services agency has not provided to the
 person a timely and adequate notice of action for the collection of the overpayment or the overissuance.

(2) (A) For purposes of paragraph (1), the county human services agency shall be deemed to be in receipt of IEVS data match information indicating any potential for an overpayment or an overissuance following 45 days from the date of the county human services agency’s possession of that information.

(B) Notwithstanding
 subparagraph (A), if the county human services agency does not complete the required actions for an IEVS data match for a CalFresh or CalWORKs applicant or recipient within 45 days of receipt of information pursuant to Section 272.8 of Title 7 of, or Section 205.56 of Title 45 of, the Code of Federal Regulations, or their successors, but is authorized to exceed the 45-day period due to exceptions provided under those regulations or under any other federal law, the county human services agency shall be deemed, for purposes
 of paragraph (1), to be in receipt of IEVS data match information
 indicating any potential for an overpayment or an overissuance following the combined total of 45 days and the authorized delay from the date of the county human services agency’s possession of that information.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 390, Sec. 1.   (SB 360)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 10. Reporting on Incarcerated Individuals [10985. - 10985.]

10985.

(a) Each city, county, or city and county, that operates a jail, shall report twice each month to the department the name, known aliases, birth date, social security number, and expected released date, if known, of any person whose period of incarceration in jail has exceeded 30 days. The report shall not include names previously reported unless it is for a new period of incarceration.

(b) (1) The director may establish a uniform data format for the reporting of the data required to be reported in subdivision (a).

(2) The director shall reimburse each reporting entity, except for those entities seeking reimbursement pursuant to Part 7 (commencing with Section 17500) of Division 4 of Title 2 of the Government Code, at a rate of ten dollars for each unduplicated person reported pursuant to subdivision (a).

(3) The state may make payments to local entities pursuant to paragraph (1) or pursuant to Part 7 (commencing with Section 17500) of Division 4 of Title 2 of the Government Code only for a name previously reported by that entity if it is reported for a new period of incarceration.

(4) The director shall annually determine the program savings to the state that result from the reporting of names required by subdivision (a). The annual Budget Act may provide for reimbursement at a level below that provided in paragraph (2) if the savings are not sufficient to offset the cost of the reimbursements.

(c) The director shall distribute information received pursuant to subdivision (a) to departments of the state and federal government and to local agencies that administer public benefits for which incarceration affects eligibility, to ensure that public assistance payments and other public benefits are not paid to persons who are ineligible to receive those benefits based on incarceration, or whose absence from the household would result in a recalculation of the benefits of other members of the household. For the purpose of reports to federal agencies under this section, the local jail shall be considered the reporting institution.

(d) The director may suspend the reporting requirement established in this section if the director determines that data available from other sources provide timely information on the identity of jail inmates that will ensure that public assistance payments and other public benefits are not paid to ineligible persons.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 205, Sec. 1.   Effective July 22, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 3. AID AND MEDICAL ASSISTANCE [11000. - 15771.]



  CHAPTER 1. General Provisions [11000. - 11175.]



  ARTICLE 1. Policies and Purposes [11000. - 11023.7.]

11000.

The provisions of law relating to a public assistance program shall be fairly and equitably construed to effect the stated objects and purposes of the program.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1982, Ch. 409, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

11001.

No person receiving aid under a public assistance program shall be considered a pauper or an indigent by reason thereof, and no warrant drawn in payment of the aid given shall contain any reference to indigency or pauperism.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1784.)
-------------------------------------------

11002.

All aid given under a public assistance program shall be absolutely inalienable by any assignment, sale, or otherwise.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1982, Ch. 497, Sec. 182.   Operative July 1, 1983, by Sec. 185 of Ch. 497.)
-------------------------------------------

11003.

If the United States Department of Health, Education, and Welfare issues a formal ruling that any section of this code relating to public assistance cannot be given effect without causing this state’s plan to be out of conformity with federal requirements, the section shall become inoperative to the extent that it is not in conformity with federal requirements.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1784.)
-------------------------------------------

11004.

The provisions of this code relative to public social services for which state grants-in-aid are made to the counties shall be administered fairly to the end that all persons who are eligible and apply for those public social services shall receive the assistance to which they are entitled promptly, with due consideration for the needs of applicants and the safeguarding of public funds.

(a) Any applicant for, or recipient or payee of, those public social services shall be informed as to the provisions of eligibility and the responsibility to report facts material to a correct determination of eligibility and grant.

(b) Any applicant for, or recipient or payee of, those public social services shall be responsible for
 reporting accurately and completely within the applicant’s, recipient’s, or payee’s competence those facts required pursuant to subdivision (a) and to promptly report any changes in those facts.

(c) Current and future grants payable to an assistance unit may be reduced because of prior overpayments. In cases in which the overpayment was caused by agency error, grant payments shall be reduced by 5 percent of the maximum aid payment of the assistance unit. Grant payments to be adjusted because of prior overpayments because of any other reason shall be reduced by 10 percent of the maximum aid payments for the assistance unit. A recipient may have an overpayment adjustment in excess of the amounts allowable under this section if the recipient requests it.

(d) A determination of ineligibility shall not be made retrospectively so as to result in an assessment of an overpayment when
 there is a failure on the part of an applicant or recipient to perform an act constituting a condition of eligibility, if the failure is caused by an error made by a state agency or a county welfare department, and if the amount of the grant received by the applicant or recipient would not have been different had the act been performed.

(e) Prior to effectuating any reduction of current grants to recover past overpayments, the recipient shall be advised of the proposed reduction and of the recipient’s entitlement to a hearing on the propriety of the reduction.

(f) If the department determines after a hearing that an overpayment has occurred, the county providing the public social services shall seek to recover the overpayment in accordance with subdivision (c), including any amount paid while the hearing process was pending. That adjustment shall be permitted concurrently with any
 suit for restitution, and recovery of overpayment by adjustment shall reduce by the amount of such recovery the extent of liability for restitution.

(g) (1) If the individual responsible for an overpayment is no longer receiving aid under Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 11200), recovery of overpayments received under that chapter shall not be attempted when the outstanding overpayments are less than two hundred fifty dollars ($250). When an overpayment collection is attempted, reasonable cost-effective efforts at collection shall be implemented. Reasonable efforts shall include notification of the amount of the overpayment and that repayment is required. The department shall define reasonable cost-effective collection methods. In cases involving fraud, every effort shall be made to collect the overpayments regardless of the amount.

(2) The department may
 establish a threshold higher than two hundred fifty dollars ($250) if it determines that a higher threshold is more cost effective, but the department shall not set a lower threshold than that amount.

(3) Notwithstanding subdivision (c), a county shall discharge an overpayment if the county determines that the overpayment has been caused by a major systemic error or negligence, as those terms are defined by the department.

(h) If the individual responsible for the overpayment to the assistance unit becomes a member of another assistance unit, recovery of overpayments shall be made against the individual or the individual’s present assistance unit, or both.

(i) (1) If an overpayment has been made to an assistance unit that is no longer receiving public social services, recovery shall be made by
 appropriate action under state law.

(2) This paragraph shall be operative when the Statewide Automated Welfare System (SAWS) can automate its provisions. Except in cases involving overpayments due to fraud or an investigation into suspected fraud, if the individual responsible for the overpayment has not received aid under Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 11200) for 36 consecutive months or longer, the county shall deem an overpayment uncollectible and discharge, in accordance with existing discharge procedures, an overpayment received under that chapter.

(j) A civil or criminal action shall not be commenced against any person based on alleged unlawful application for or receipt of public social services if the case record, or any consumer credit report used in the civil or criminal case of that person for the purpose of determining that the overpayment, has not been made
 available to that person or has been destroyed after the expiration of the three-year retention period pursuant to Section 10851.

(k) (1) When an underpayment or denial of public social services occurs and, as a result, the applicant or recipient does not receive the amount to which the applicant or recipient is entitled, the county shall provide public social services equal to the full amount of the underpayment unless prohibited by federal law. In cases that have both an underpayment and an overpayment, the underpayment shall be offset against the overpayment prior to correcting any remaining underpayment.

(2) Any corrective payments made pursuant to this subdivision shall be disregarded in determining the income of the family and shall be disregarded in determining the resources of the family in the month the corrective payment is made and in the following
 month.

(l) This subdivision is applicable only to applicants, recipients, and payees under Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 11200) of Part 3 of Division 9. Any suits to recover overpayments described in subdivision (f) shall be brought on behalf of the county by the county counsel unless the board of supervisors delegates that duty to the district attorney by ordinance or resolution.

(m) This section shall become inoperative on July 1, 2022, or on the date the
 department notifies the Legislature that the Statewide Automated Welfare System can perform the necessary automation to implement this section, as added by the act that added this subdivision, whichever date is later, and is repealed on January 1 of the following year.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 85, Sec. 26.   (AB 135)   Effective July 16, 2021.   Conditionally inoperative July 1, 2022, or later date, by its own provisions.    Repealed on January 1 after inoperative date.    See later operative version added by Sec. 27 of Stats. 2021, Ch. 85.)
-------------------------------------------

11004.

The provisions of this code relative to public social services for which state grants-in-aid are made to the counties shall be administered fairly to the end that all persons who are eligible and apply for those public social services shall receive the assistance to which they are entitled promptly, with due consideration for the needs of applicants and the safeguarding of public funds.

(a) Any applicant for, or recipient or payee of, those public social services shall be informed as to the provisions of eligibility and the responsibility to report facts material to a correct determination of eligibility and grant.

(b) Any applicant for, or recipient or payee of, those public social services shall be
 responsible for reporting accurately and completely within the applicant’s, recipient’s, or payee’s competence those facts required pursuant to subdivision (a) and to promptly report any changes in those facts.

(c) Current and future grants payable to an assistance unit may be reduced because of prior overpayments. In cases in which the overpayment was caused by agency error, grant payments shall be reduced by 5 percent of the maximum aid payment of the assistance unit. Grant payments to be adjusted because of prior overpayments because of any other reason shall be reduced by 10 percent of the maximum aid payments for the assistance unit. A recipient may have an overpayment adjustment in excess of the amounts allowable under this section if the recipient requests it.

(d) A determination of ineligibility shall not be made retrospectively so as to result in an assessment of an